Tennessee, session 114, HB0286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Each agency head shall complete periodic training for purposes of complying
with this part.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0286
000367
- 1 -